Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2438
Control, controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, defined.

Control, controlling, controlled by, or under common control with shall mean the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise. A person who is the owner of ten percent or more of a corporation's outstanding voting stock shall be presumed to have control of the corporation in the absence of proof by a preponderance of the evidence to the contrary. A person shall not be considered to have control of a corporation if the person holds voting power, in good faith and not for the purpose of avoiding the Shareholders Protection Act, as an agent, bank, broker, nominee, custodian, or trustee for one or more owners who do not individually or as a group have control of the corporation.

Laws 1988, LB 1110, § 8.